de: Antriebsart des Motorsteuerungssystems: Riemen; Kette; Zahnrad; Sonstige
ru: Тип привода системы ГРМ: Ремень; Цепь; Шестерня; Другое
ko: 엔진 타이밍 시스템 구동 방식: 벨트; 체인; 기어; 기타
en: Engine timing system drive type: Belt; Chain; Gear; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta pogona sustava za upravljanje vremenom motora: Remen; Lanac; Zupčanik; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de acionamento/propulsão do sistema de sincronização do motor: Correia; Corrente; Engrenagem; Outro
tr: Motor zamanlama sistemi tahrik tipi: Kayış; Zincir; Dişli; Diğer
ja: エンジンタイミングシステムの駆動タイプ: ベルト; チェーン; ギア; その他
lt-LT: Variklio paskirstymo sistemos pavaros tipas: Diržas; Grandinė; Krumpliaratis; Kita
hu: Motorvezérmű rendszer hajtástípusa: Szíj; Lánc; Fogaskerék; Egyéb
pl: Typ napędu układu rozrządu silnika: Pasek; Łańcuch; Koła zębate; Inne
sk-SK: Typ pohonu rozvodového mechanizmu motora: Remeň; Reťaz; Ozubený prevod; Iné
es: Tipo de accionamiento del sistema de sincronización del motor: Correa; Cadena; Engranaje; Otro
vi: Loại truyền động hệ thống định thời động cơ: Dây đai; Xích; Bánh răng; Khác
zh-CN: 发动机正时系统驱动类型: 皮带; 链条; 齿轮; 其他
zh-TW: 引擎正時系統驅動類型: 皮帶; 鍊條; 齒輪; 其他
it: Tipo di azionamento del sistema di fasatura del motore: Cinghia; Catena; Ingranaggio; Altro
el: Τύπος κίνησης συστήματος χρονισμού κινητήρα: Ιμάντας; Αλυσίδα; Γρανάζι; Άλλο
cs: Typ rozvodů motoru: Řemen; Řetěz; Ozubená kola; Jiné
nl: Motordistributiesysteem aandrijving type: Riem; Ketting; Tandwiel; Overig
fi: Moottorin ajoitusjärjestelmän tyyppi: Hihna; Ketju; Hammaspyörä; Muu
nb: Motorens timingsystems drivtype: Reim; Kjede; Tannhjul; Annet
pt-PT: tipo de acionamento do sistema de sincronização do motor: Correia; Corrente; Engrenagem; Outro
sv: Drivtyp för motorns kamremssystem: Rem; Kedja; Kugghjul; Annat
sl-SI: Vrsta pogona sistema krmiljenja motorja: Jermen; Veriga; Zobnik; Drugo
da: Drevtype til motorens tidsstyringssystem: Rem; Kæde; Tandhjul; Andet
bg-BG: Тип задвижване на ангренажната система: Ремък; Верига; Зъбна предавка; Друго
th: ประเภทระบบขับเคลื่อนชุดไทมิ่งเครื่องยนต์: สายพาน; โซ่; เฟือง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de propulsie a sistemului de distribuție a motorului: Curea; Lanț; Angrenaj; Altele
fr: Type d’entraînement du système de distribution du moteur: Courroie; Chaîne; Engrenage; Autre